Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.84.520

Electioneering at voting center or ballot drop location by election officers forbidden.

Any election officer who does any electioneering at a voting center or ballot drop location during the voting period that begins eighteen days before and ends the day of a special election, general election, or primary is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction must be fined in any sum not exceeding one hundred dollars and pay the costs of prosecution.

[ 2013 c 11 s 83; 2011 c 10 s 70; 2003 c 111 s 2122; 1965 c 9 s 29.51.030. Prior: 1947 c 35 s 1, part; 1889 p 412 s 33, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 5298, part. Formerly RCW 29.51.030.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.